Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
Subchapter 6
— Arkansas Teacher Retirement System — Credited Service

Preambles.

Acts 1995, No. 513 contained a preamble which read:

“WHEREAS, members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may purchase up to five (5) years of credited service toward retirement for time spent in U.S. military service; and

“WHEREAS, members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may purchase up to ten (10) years of credited service for service time teaching at an overseas school sponsored and approved by the U.S. Department of State or Department of Defense; and

“WHEREAS, members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may purchase up to ten (10) years of credited service toward retirement for time spent teaching in out-of-state service;

“NOW, THEREFORE … .”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 11, as added by Acts 1973, No. 878, § 1: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act would substantially revise the provisions and benefits provided in the Teacher Retirement System law; that it is essential that such revision be given effect on July 1, 1973 in order that the effective date of the Act will coincide with the beginning of a new fiscal year; that under the Constitution of Arkansas, Acts without an emergency clause do not take effect until ninety days after adjournment of the General Assembly and that unless an emergency is declared, extension of the regular session of the General Assembly will result in a delay in the effectiveness of this Act beyond July 1 and would work irreparable harm upon the teachers of this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 878, § 2: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 427 of 1973 relating to and making substantial revisions in the Teacher Retirement System did not contain an Emergency Clause; that it is essential to the proper administration of the Teacher Retirement System that the new provisions be given effect on July 1, 1973; that this Act is immediately necessary to amend Act 427 of 1973 to declare an emergency in order that said Act may be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 121, § 3: Feb. 13, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that it is in the best interests of both school districts and the General Assembly to allow public schoolteachers and administrators to purchase service credit for leaves of absence taken to attend to General Assembly duties. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 681, § 14: Apr. 2, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are unfair and inequitable to certain members of the Teacher Retirement System; that correction of these inequities is essential to the well being of members of the Teacher Retirement System and to efficient administration of the system. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 365, § 9: Mar. 9, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are unfair and inequitable to certain members of the Teacher Retirement System; that correction of these inequities is essential to the well being of members of the Teacher Retirement System and to efficient administration of the system. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 619, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 665, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985, No. 805, § 12: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1987, No. 4, § 6: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989, No. 652, § 14: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1991, No. 43, § 11: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 388, § 5: Mar. 7, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that a shortage exists for public school teachers in this state; that this act is necessary to encourage certified teachers who may have left the public school system to teach in certain private schools to return to public school teaching; that it is in the best interest and welfare of the people of the State of Arkansas that this act become effective immediately upon passage. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 524, § 6: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this act is essential to the continued operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 542, § 10: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that changing conditions have dictated that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement System law need to be revised and updated, that these changes are necessary for the System to continue with proper management and administration, and that the revisions in the law are essential to the continued effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 142, § 8: July 1, 1998.

Acts 1997, No. 739, § 2, provided: “The provisions of § 24-7-602 shall be effective from and after December 12, 1994 and shall be retroactive to that date.”

Acts 1997, No. 739, § 6: Mar. 21, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of Arkansas Teacher Retirement laws are not in compliance with requirements under federal law and that it is necessary to bring the laws of the State of Arkansas into agreement with those requirements as soon as possible. Therefore, in order for this act to have immediate and retroactive effect, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved or vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 28: July 1, 1998.

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 110, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System law recognizes private school and out-of-state service for the purchase of credited service; that allowing the purchase of smaller increments of credited service will help members achieve more service credit for their teaching careers, that by increasing the benefit to members, more educators will be encouraged to stay in the teaching career fields; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 866, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System law must be changed and refined periodically to clarify existing administrative practices within the system, that clarifying incorrect references and language in current law consumes a considerable amount of administrative time and effort, that the law needs to be clarified to reduce the cost and effort of responding to those inconsistencies, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the State's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 19: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that this act makes various technical corrections in the Arkansas Code; that this act further clarifies the law to provide that the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may correct errors resulting from enactments of prior sessions; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to be applicable during the codification process of the enactments of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1296, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that that members of the Teacher Retirement System sometimes serve in the Arkansas National Guard, that current retirement laws do not permit those members to purchase that service, but active duty military service can be purchased; that Arkansas National Guard service by teachers is vital to and more directly benefits the citizens of Arkansas than does active duty military service; that it is inequitable to not provide for the purchase of National Guard service under the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2005, No. 385, § 10: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System law must be changed and refined periodically to clarify existing administrative practices within the system; that clarifying incorrect references and language in current law consumes a considerable amount of administrative time and effort; that the law needs to be clarified to reduce the cost and effort of responding to those inconsistencies; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 97, § 19: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System require technical revisions; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state’s fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 468, § 28:
July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in dire need of technical correction to bring them into conformance with the current public pension policy; that such technical correction is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 45, § 22: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System assets and accounting are complex, and the system must be able to appropriately manage the system members accounts and benefits; that many of these technical corrections are currently the policy of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and should be codified to reflect that policy; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 66, § 2: Feb. 18, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that members with service in the national guard from other states and the armed forces reserve are currently excluded from purchasing this important service; the ability to purchase this important service should be allowed immediately to give these members the ability to purchased this service without delay; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist
and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 69, § 22: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that a member's purchase of service credit currently provides that a member pay the system yesterday's dollars for the value of today's benefits; that such a valuation is unfair to the members as a whole and inconsistent with the prudent management of the system's funds and obligations; that the purchase of service credit in the system should be based upon actuarial equivalents; that the purchase of service credit should be paid in a lump sum to the system; that current service purchase accounts remain unpaid and inactive for many years at a time and create an administrative burden and accounting difficulty on the system that can be remedied by the passage of this act; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2011, No. 974, § 9: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are urgently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the school year calendar has historically been expanding with the addition of teacher service requirements and other legislative initiatives while the number of days of service has remained unchanged since the 1970s; that this legislation is necessary to account for the changes in teacher service requirements and to make the retirement system more reflective of the actual number of days of service; and that this act is necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2013, No. 555, § 3: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act need revision to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that a reciprocal retirement system may have different requirements regarding the compilation of credited service and computation of final average salary for retirement purposes; that it is not unusual for members to change jobs and thus become a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System from a reciprocal retirement system with different rules regarding retirement; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System strives to operate a fair system with rules that are respectful of the reciprocal system and give the member the retirement benefits to which they are entitled; that the system operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year; that having a July 1, 2013, effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to provide proper administration and that this act is necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2015, No. 90, § 2: Feb. 13, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex and the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to operate the system efficiently and effectively; that until this act become effective, members will be unable to purchase additional certified private school service; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 301, § 11: Mar. 4, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex and the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of clarification to operate the system efficiently and effectively; that such clarification is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 558, § 2: Mar. 20, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state
public retirement system are complex and the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of clarification to operate the system efficiently and effectively; that such clarification is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that
this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 200, § 2: Feb. 17, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating in order to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of a great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exists and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public, peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date it is approved by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 612, § 2: Mar. 23, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 427, § 23: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, an act that created a state agency for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that a July 1, 2019 effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to provide for the proper administration of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; that the updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of great importance for actuarial purposes and the protection of member benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 595, § 4: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act which created the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as a state agency for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees in Arkansas, are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that having a July 1, 2019 effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to take effect on the first day of the fiscal year in order to facilitate the proper administration of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; that revisions and updates to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of great importance for actuarial purposes and to protect member benefits; and that this act is necessary to maintain an orderly system of managing member benefits offered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.